Tennessee, session 114, SB2624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, is amended by deleting
part 26.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, is amended by deleting
part 35.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 10, is amended by deleting
part 14.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2624
012257
- 1 -